Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1221
Board; executive secretary; offices.

The department shall designate an individual with the approval of the board to serve as executive secretary of the board, and the department shall furnish such offices and materials as may be necessary for the efficient operation of the board.

Laws 1986, LB 310, § 21.